Utah statutes.
13-1a-7.   Hearing powers.

(1)  The director, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, may hold or cause to be held administrative hearings regarding any matter affecting the division or the incorporation or registration activities of any business governed by the laws administered by the division.

(2)  The director or the director's designee, for the purposes outlined in this chapter or any chapter administered by the division, may administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses, and compel the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and evidence.

